California statutes. Public Resources Code
 thousand dollars ($200,000).(2) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for the development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property consisting of locally and regionally operated lakes, reservoirs and waterways.(3) Forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) for expenditure by the Department of Parks and Recreation for the purposes of the Roberti-Z’berg Urban Open-spaces and Recreation Program Act (commencing with Section 5620 of the Public Resources Code); provided however, that notwithstanding Section 5627, funds made available pursuant to this category may be expended only for capital outlay purposes.(4) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition, development, rehabilita­tion, or restoration of historical re­sources and for historical resources preservation projects and costs of planning and interpretation.(5) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for the acquisi­tion, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for park and recreational purposes by non­profit organizations.(b)For acquisition, development, rehabilita­tion, or restoration of real property for the state park system in accordance with the following schedule: $145,000,000Schedule:(1) Forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) for acquisition of real property inside the boundaries of existing proj­ects or units or as additions to existing projects or units; provided, however, that not more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be expended on any one project or unit of the state park system.(2) Forty million five hundred thousand dollars ($40,500,000) for develop­ment, rehabilitation, or restoration of coastal resources, other than coastal resources in or on
 San Francisco Bay, in accordance with the following schedule:Schedule:(A) Twenty-eight million five hundred thousand dollars ($28,500,000) within San Diego County through Santa Barbara County.(B) Seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) within San Luis Obispo County through the City and County of San Francisco.(C) Four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) within Marin County through Del Norte County.(3) Fourteen million five hundred thou­sand dollars ($14,500,000) for devel­opment, rehabilitation, or restoration of resources in or on San Francisco Bay.(4) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration of inland resources.(5) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration at lakes, reservoirs, and waterways, including state water fa­cilities, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (d) of Section 12934 of the Water Code.(6) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the repair of storm damage and construction to prevent future storm damage.(7) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for planning, development, rehabilita­tion, restoration, or interpretive faci­lities in support of volunteer commu­nity action projects for the state park system.(8) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the increased stewardship of the public investment in the protection of the most critical natural and scenic features of the existing state park system.(9) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for the state park system within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.(c)For the acquisition, development, or restoration of real property for wildlife management in accordance with the provisions of the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code), including costs for planning and interpretation in accordance with the following schedule: $25,000,000Schedule:(1) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for wildlife management.(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for the acquisition, rehabilitation, or restoration of habitat for any bird, mammal, fish, amphibia or reptile declared rare or endangered pursuant to the Federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (Title 16, United States Code Sec. 1531 et seq.) and subsequent amendments or designated by state statute as fully protected.(d)(1) This subdivision shall become opera­tive only if Senate Bill 512 of the 1983-84 Regular Session of the Legis­lature is approved by the voters, in which case, subdivision (c) of this sec­tion shall not be operative.(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the Santa Monica Mountains Conser­vancy for the purposes set forth in Di­vision 23 (commencing with Section 33000), and for administrative costs directly incurred in connection therewith.(3) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for expenditure by the Wildlife Con­servation Board pursuant to the Wild­life Conservation Law of 1947 (Chap­ter 4 (commencing with Section
 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code in accordance with the following schedule:Schedule:(A) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for coastal fishing piers.(B) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for acquisition, develop­ment, rehabilitation, or resto­ration of real property for wild­life-oriented public use proj­ects.(4) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or resto­ration of real property for the state park system in
 accordance with the following schedule:Schedule:(A) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) in augmentation of subdivision (b) for develop­ment and restoration of histori­cal resources and for historical resources preservation proj­ects and costs of planning and interpretation.(B) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) in augmentation of cate­gory (4) of subdivision (b).(C) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in augmentation of cate­gory (2) of subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.232.

All money deposited in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund of 1984, not to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), shall be available for appropriation in the manner set forth in Section 5096.260 for the purposes set forth below in amounts not to exceed the following:(a) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for the purposes set forth
 in Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000), and for state administrative costs directly incurred in connection therewith.(b) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for grants to local public agencies or nonprofit organizations for projects in the San Francisco Bay and the Suisun Marsh of which not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated to urban waterfront projects, and for state administrative costs directly incurred in connection therewith.(c) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for grants to local public agencies or nonprofit organizations to acquire, develop, or restore real property that consist of projects provided for in local coastal programs pursuant to Division 20 (commencing
 with Section 30000), and for state administrative costs directly incurred in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Local Assistance Grants [5096.233. - 5096.237.]

5096.233.

(a) All of the funds authorized in categories (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 shall be available for grants on a competitive basis for projects which will fulfill one or more of the following objectives: rehabilitation or restoration of existing facilities, development of facilities to serve urban populations, development of facilities which increase the grant recipient’s revenues by expanding public recreation services, or stimulation of new jobs. After at least two public
 hearings, the Director of Parks and Recreation shall prepare and the Secretary of the Resources Agency shall adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating those competitive grants.

(b) The funds authorized in category (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 shall be available for appropriation of not more than twenty-eight million five hundred thousand dollars ($28,500,000) in the 1985–86 fiscal year and for appropriation of not more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in each of the 1986–87 and 1987–88 fiscal years and shall be allocated among cities, counties, and districts located within the following regions in accordance with the following schedule, reduced pro rata by the amount of state administrative costs directly incurred under that category:1986–871985–86and 1987–88Schedule:fiscal yearfiscal years(1) Del Norte, Humboldt, Mendo­cino, and Lake Counties $ 300,000$ 250,000(2) Siskiyou, Modoc, Trinity, Shas­ta, Lassen, Tehama, Plumas, Glenn, Butte, and Colusa Counties $ 700,000$ 650,000(3) Sierra, Sutter, Yuba, Nevada, Yolo, Placer, Sacramento, and El Dorado Counties $1,511,000$1,300,000(4) Sonoma, Napa, Solano, Marin, Contra Costa, San Mateo, Ala­meda, and Santa Clara Coun­ties and the City and County of San Francisco $6,203,000$5,385,000(5) Amador, Alpine, San Joaquin, Calaveras, Tuolumne, Stanis­laus, and Merced
 Counties $ 995,000$ 850,000(6) Mariposa, Madera, Fresno, Kings, Tulare, and Kern Coun­ties $1,580,000$1,360,000(7) Santa Cruz, San
 Benito, Mon­terey, San Luis Obispo, and Santa Barbara Counties $1,119,000$1,000,000(8) Ventura, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, Orange, River­side, and Imperial Counties $ 13,795,000$ 12,100,000(9) San Diego County $2,147,000$1,980,000(10) Mono and Inyo Counties $ 150,000$ 125,000(c) Notwithstanding the schedule in subdivision (b), each county together with the cities and districts within that county
 shall be entitled to compete for not less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in grants under category (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.234.

Funds appropriated for local assistance grants pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years of the date when the appropriation became effective, regardless of the date when each project was approved pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5096.236.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.235.

(a) Funds available for appropriation for local assistance grants pursuant to category (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 may be expended for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of parks, beaches, open-space lands, recreational trails, or recreational facilities and areas, and for development rights or scenic easements in connection with those acquisitions.

(b) The funds authorized in category (4) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 shall be available as grants on a competitive basis to cities, counties, and districts and shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years of the date when the appropriation became effective, regardless of the date when each project was approved pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5096.236. The Director of Parks and Recreation, through the Office of Historic Preservation, shall prepare and the Secretary of the Resources Agency shall adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating those competitive grants. An individual jurisdiction may enter into an agreement with a nonprofit organization for the purpose of carrying out a grant, subject to the requirements of subdivision (c).

(c) Funds granted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 may be expended for development, rehabilitation, or restoration only on lands owned by, or subject to a lease or other interest held by, the applicant city,
 county, or district. If those lands are not owned by the applicant, the applicant shall first demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Director of Parks and Recreation that the development, rehabilitation, or restoration will provide benefits commensurate with the type and duration of interest in land held by the applicant.

(d) The funds authorized in category (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231 shall be available as grants on a competitive basis to nonprofit organizations that provide park, recreation, or open space services or facilities to the general public. The Director of Parks and Recreation shall prepare, and the Secretary of the Resources Agency shall adopt, criteria and procedures for evaluating those competitive grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.236.

(a) An application for a local assistance grant pursuant to this article shall be submitted to the Director of Parks and Recreation for review. Except for an application for a grant under category (4) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.231, the application shall be accompanied by certification from the planning agency of the applicant that the project is consistent with the park and recreation plan for the applicant’s jurisdiction and would satisfy a demonstrated need.

(b) The minimum amount that may be applied for any individual project is ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(c) Every application for a grant shall comply with the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(d) Upon completion of the review of applications submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), approved projects shall be forwarded to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.237.

(a) No state grant funds authorized under Section 5096.231 may be disbursed until the applicant agrees that any property acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored with the funds shall be used by the applicant only for the purpose for which the funds were requested and that no other use, sale, or other disposition of the property shall be permitted except by specific act of the Legislature. If the use of the property is changed to one other than permitted under the category in subdivision (a)
 of Section 5096.231 from which the funds were appropriated, or the property is sold or otherwise disposed of, an amount equal to the amount of the grant or equal to the fair market value of the real property, or portion thereof, acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored with the grant, whichever is greater, shall be used by the city, county, or district for a purpose authorized in that category or shall be reimbursed to the fund for a use authorized in that category.

(b) No state grant funds authorized under Section 5096.231 may be disbursed unless the applicant agrees to maintain and operate the property acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored pursuant to this article for a period commensurate with the type of project and the proportion of state grant funds and local funds allocated to the capital costs of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. State Park System [5096.241. - 5096.243.]

5096.241.

The Legislature recognizes that public financial resources are inadequate to meet all capital outlay needs of the state park system and that the development of recently acquired units of the state park system has proceeded at a rate that has prevented their full potential for public use from being realized. Accordingly, it is declared to be the policy of the state that funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5096.231 shall be appropriated primarily for projects that accomplish the following:

(a) Serve metropolitan population centers and accommodate day-use and weekend-overnight visits.

(b) Provide for the development of existing units with the minimum facilities necessary for accessibility, use, and interpretation.

(c) Rehabilitate facilities at existing units that will provide for more efficient management and reduced operational costs.

(d) Minimize dependence on motor vehicles and reduce other forms of energy and water consumption through appropriately designed facilities.

(e) Acquire those lands which will lead to the completion of ongoing projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.242.

(a) Any Member of the Legislature, the State Park and Recreation Commission, the California Coastal Commission, or the Secretary of the Resources Agency may nominate any project to be funded under this article for study by the Department of Parks and Recreation. The State Park and Recreation Commission shall nominate projects after holding at least one public hearing to seek project proposals from individuals, citizen groups, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and other public agencies. Any of the commissions shall make nominations by vote of its membership.

(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall study any project so nominated.

(c) Nominated projects shall be approved by the Secretary of the Resources Agency and forwarded by the secretary to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 142.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, and approved in Prop. 18 on June 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.243.

(a) Acquisition for the state park system by purchase or by eminent domain shall be under the Property Acquisition Law (commencing with Section 15850 of the Government Code).

(b) Work efforts for stewardship purposes may include, but are not limited to, such objectives as the control of major erosion and geologic hazards, the restoration and improvement of critical plant and animal habitat, the control and elimination of exotic
 species encroachment, the stabilization of coastal dunes and bluffs, and the planning necessary to implement those activities. Those efforts may not include activities which merely supplement normal park system operations or which are usually funded from other sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. State Coastal Conservancy [5096.244. - 5096.244.]

5096.244.

(a) The State Coastal Conservancy shall prepare and adopt priorities, criteria, and procedures for the making of grants to local public agencies or nonprofit organizations pursuant to Section 5096.232.

The procedures shall specify the categories of expenditures for grants, and shall include procedures for the submittal, review, and approval of applications, disbursements, and, where appropriate, repayment of grant funds.

(b) An application for a grant pursuant to this article shall be submitted to the State Coastal Conservancy for evaluation, review of adequacy, and classification as a park, beach, coastal access, or other project necessary to protect coastal resource values.

(c) The minimum amount that may be applied for any individual project is one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) Every application for a grant shall comply with the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)). 

(e) Funds granted pursuant to Section 5096.232 may be expended for development, rehabilitation, or restoration only on lands owned by, or subject to a lease or other interest held by, the applicant. If those lands are not owned by the applicant, the applicant shall first demonstrate to the
 satisfaction of the State Coastal Conservancy that the development, rehabilitation, or restoration will provide benefits commensurate with the type and duration of interest in land held by the applicant.

(f) No state grant funds authorized under Section 5096.232 may be disbursed until the applicant agrees that any property acquired or developed with the funds shall be used by the applicant only for the purpose for which the funds were requested and that no other use, sale, or other disposition of the property shall be permitted except by specific act of the Legislature. If the use of the property is changed to one other than permitted under the category in Section 5096.232 from which the funds were appropriated, or the property is sold or otherwise disposed of, an amount equal to the amount of the grant or equal to the fair market value of the real property, or portion thereof, acquired or developed with the grant, whichever is greater, shall
 be used by the local public agency or the nonprofit organization for a purpose authorized in that category or shall be reimbursed to the State Coastal Conservancy Fund of 1984 for a use authorized in that category.

(g) No state grant funds authorized under Section 5096.232 may be disbursed unless the applicant agrees to maintain and operate the property acquired or developed pursuant to this article for a period commensurate with the type of project and the proportion of state grant funds and local funds allocated to the capital costs of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 173.   Effective October 12, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, and approved in Prop. 18 on June 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [5096.245. - 5096.251.]

5096.245.

Projects authorized for the purposes set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5096.231 shall be subject to augmentation as provided in Section 16352 of the Government Code, as limited by any provision of the Budget Act. The unexpended balance in any appropriation made payable from the fund which the Director of Finance, with the approval of the State Public Works Board, determines not to be required for expenditure pursuant to the appropriation, may be transferred on order of the Director of Finance to, and in
 augmentation of, the appropriation made in Section 16352 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.246.

The Department of General Services, if the Director of Parks and Recreation finds that the use would be compatible with the ultimate use of the real property as a unit, or part of a unit, of the state park system and with the sound management and conservation of resources within the unit, may make agreements with respect to any real property acquired pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5096.231, and the Executive Officer of the State Coastal Conservancy may make agreements with respect to any real property acquired
 pursuant to Section 5096.232, for the continued tenancy of the seller of the property for a period of time and under such conditions as mutually agreed upon by the state and the seller so long as the seller promises to pay such taxes on his or her interest in the property as shall become due, owing, or unpaid on the interest created by the agreement, and so long as the seller conducts any operations on the land according to specifications issued by the appropriate director or officer to protect the property for the public use for which it was acquired. A copy of the agreement shall be filed with the county clerk in the county in which the property lies. The arrangement shall be compatible with the operation of the area by the state, as determined by the appropriate director or officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.247.

All real property acquired pursuant to this chapter shall be acquired in compliance with the provisions of Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall prescribe procedures sufficient to assure compliance by local public agencies which receive funds under Section 5096.231 and the State Coastal Conservancy shall prescribe procedures sufficient to assure compliance by local public agencies which receive funds under Section
 5096.232.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.248.

For the purposes of this chapter, acquisition may include gifts, purchases, leases, easements, the exercise of eminent domain if expressly authorized, the transfer or exchange of property for other property of like value, and purchases of development rights and other interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.249.

All grants, gifts, devises, or bequests to the state, conditional or unconditional, for park, conservation, recreation, or other purposes for which real property may be acquired or developed pursuant to this chapter, may be accepted and received on behalf of the state by the appropriate departmental director with the approval of the Director of Finance. The grants, gifts, devises, or bequests shall be available, when appropriated by the Legislature, for expenditure for the purposes specified in Sections 5096.231 and
 5096.232.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.250.

Real property acquired by the state shall consist predominantly of open or natural lands, including lands under water capable of being utilized for multiple recreational purposes, and lands necessary for the preservation of coastal or historical resources. No funds derived from the bonds authorized by this division shall be expended for the construction of any reservoir designated as a part of the “State Water Facilities,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 12934 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.251.

(a) Prior to recommending the acquisition of lands that are located on or near tidelands, submerged lands, swamp or overflowed lands, or other wetlands, whether or not those lands have been granted in trust to a local public agency, the Director of Parks and Recreation or the Executive Officer of the State Coastal Conservancy, as appropriate, shall submit to the State Lands Commission any proposal by a state or local public agency for the acquisition of those lands pursuant to this chapter. The
 State Lands Commission shall, within three months of submittal, review the proposed acquisition, make a determination as to the state’s existing or potential interest in the lands, and report its findings to the person making the submittal and to the Department of General Services.

(b) No provision of this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the condemnation of state lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Fiscal Provisions [5096.255. - 5096.267.]

5096.255.

Bonds in the total amount of three hundred sixty-eight million nine hundred thousand dollars ($368,900,000), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest on the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 92.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, and approved in Prop. 18 on June 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.256.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on the bonds maturing each year, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.257.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this chapter, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal and interest on bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, as principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 5096.259, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.258.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Parklands Fund of 1984 or the State Coastal Conservancy Fund of 1984, which are hereby created. The money in the Parklands Fund of 1984 may be expended only for the purposes specified in this chapter and only pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature in the manner prescribed in this chapter. The money in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund of 1984 may be expended only for the purposes specified in Section 5096.232 and only
 pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.259.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article, the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any moneys deposited in the fund for expenditure for the purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.231 shall be appropriated to the Department of Parks and Recreation in the manner provided in Section 5096.260.
 Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund from moneys received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.2595.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required
 under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.260.

(a) Except for proposed appropriations under Section 5096.232, proposed appropriations for the program shall be included in a section in the Budget Bill for the 1984–85 fiscal year and each succeeding fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature and shall bear the caption “Parklands Acquisition and Development Program of 1984.” The section shall contain separate items for each project, each class of projects, or each element of the program for which an appropriation is made.

(b) All proposed appropriations for the program under Section 5096.232 shall be included in a section in the Budget Bill for the 1984–85 fiscal year and each succeeding fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature and shall bear the caption “State Coastal Conservancy.” The section shall contain separate items for each project, each class of projects, or each element of the program for which an appropriation is made.

(c) All appropriations shall be subject to all limitations enacted in the Budget Act and to all fiscal procedures prescribed by law with respect to the expenditure of state funds unless expressly exempted from those laws by a statute enacted by the Legislature. Those sections shall contain proposed appropriations only for the program elements and classes of projects contemplated by this chapter, and no funds derived from the bonds authorized by this chapter may be
 expended pursuant to an appropriation not contained in those sections of the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.261.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law are applicable to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.262.

For the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Parklands Program Finance Committee is hereby created. The committee consists of the Governor, the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Treasurer, and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. For the purposes of this chapter, the Parklands Program Finance Committee
 shall be “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, and the Treasurer shall serve as chair of the committee. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency is hereby designated as “the board” for the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 10.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.263.

As used in this chapter, and for the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, “state grant” or “state grant moneys” means moneys received by the state from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter which are available for grants to counties, cities, districts, local public agencies, and nonprofit organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.264.

All money deposited in the fund or the State Coastal Conservancy Fund of 1984 which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in those depositories and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.265.

Commencing with the Budget Bill for the 1993–94 fiscal year, the balances remaining in the fund and the State Coastal Conservancy Fund of 1984 may be appropriated by the Legislature for expenditure, without regard to the maximum amounts allocated to each element of the program, for any or all elements of the program specified in Sections 5096.231 and 5096.232, or any class or classes of projects within those elements, that the Legislature deems to be of the highest priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.266.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.267.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 18 at the June 5, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.692. Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2000 (The Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) [5096.300. - 5096.372.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5096.300. - 5096.309.]

5096.300.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2000 (the Villaraigosa-Keeley Act).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.301.

Responding to the recreational and open-space needs of a growing population and expanding urban communities, this act will revive state stewardship of natural resources by investing in neighborhood parks and state parks, clean water protection, and coastal beaches and scenic areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.302.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Historically, California’s local and neighborhood parks often serve as the recreational, social, and cultural centers for cities and communities, providing venues for youth enrichment, senior activities, and family recreation.

(b) Neighborhood and state parks provide safe places to play in the urban
 neighborhoods, splendid scenic landscapes, exceptional experiences, and world-recognized recreational opportunities, and in so doing, are vital to California’s quality of life and economy.
